Hawaii statutes.
[§431:14G-103]
Making of rates. (a) Rates shall not be excessive, inadequate, or
unfairly discriminatory and shall be reasonable in relation to the costs of the
benefits provided.

(b) Except
to the extent necessary to meet subsection
(a), uniformity among managed care plans in any matters within the scope of
this section shall be neither required nor prohibited. [L 2007, c 175, pt of
§2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next